Maryland, session 2026, HB0022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–609.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
SERVING A SENTENCE OF 18 MONTHS OR MORE AT A STATE CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY.
(B) (1) ON TAKING CUSTODY OF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
SENTENCED TO THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION, THE COMMISSIONER OF
CORRECTION SHALL DETERMINE AND MAKE A RECORD OF WHETHER THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS IN POSSESSION OF:
(I) A BIRTH CERTIFICATE;
(II) A SOCIAL SECURITY CARD; AND
(III) 1. A DRIVER’S LICENSE; OR
2. A VALID PHOTO IDENTIFICATION CARD ISSUED BY
THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 12–301 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(2) THE MANAGING OFFICIAL OF A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE SAFEKEEPING AND CARE OF EACH IDENTIFICATION
DOCUMENT IN THE POSSESSION OF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AT THE TIME OF
INTAKE FROM THE TIME THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS LAWFULLY DETAINED
IN OR COMMITTED TO THE FACILITY UNTIL DISCHARGED, RELEASED, OR
WITHDRAWN UNDER A COURT ORDER OR OTHER LAWFUL AUTHORITY.
(a) (C) (1) The EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE Commissioner of Correction shall issue an identification card to an
incarcerated individual before release from confinement in a State correctional facility.
(2) The identification card issued under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall meet the requirements [for secondary identification for the purpose of an
identification card issued by the Motor Vehicle Administration under § 12–301] SET
FORTH IN § 12–301.1 of the Transportation Article.

HOUSE BILL 22 3
(3) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE
COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION HAS DETERMINED THAT THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL IS IN POSSESSION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S
IDENTIFICATION THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF AN IDENTIFICATION CARD
ISSUED BY THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION SET FORTH IN § 12–301.1 OF
THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(b) (D) (1) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, on
taking custody of an incarcerated individual sentenced to the Division of Correction AT
LEAST 9 MONTHS BEFORE THE ANTICIPATED RELEASE OF AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL, the Commissioner of Correction shall begin the process of obtaining the
incarcerated individual’s birth certificate.
(ii) If an incarcerated individual’s birth certificate is obtained under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Commissioner of Correction shall provide the
incarcerated individual with the birth certificate before release from confinement in a State
correctional facility.
(2) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the
Commissioner of Correction shall apply to the Social Security Administration to obtain an
incarcerated individual’s Social Security card:
1. at the earliest date possible in accordance with any
memorandum of understanding between the Division of Correction and the Social Security
Administration providing for the issuance of incarcerated individual Social Security cards;
or
2. as soon as is practicable.
(ii) If an incarcerated individual’s Social Security card is obtained
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Commissioner of Correction shall provide the
incarcerated individual with the Social Security card before release from confinement in a
State correctional facility.
(3) (I) The Commissioner of Correction may not obtain a document
under paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection unless the incarcerated individual consents in
writing to the Commissioner of Correction obtaining the document.
(II) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF
THE COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION HAS DETERMINED THAT THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL IS IN POSSESSION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S BIRTH
CERTIFICATE.
(III) PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF
THE COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION HAS DETERMINED THAT THE INCARCERATED

HOUSE BILL 22
INDIVIDUAL IS IN POSSESSION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S SOCIAL
SECURITY CARD.
(E) AT LEAST 6 MONTHS BEFORE THE RELEASE OF AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL, THE COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION SHALL CONFIRM WHETHER THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S DOCUMENTS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION WERE OBTAINED.
(C) (F) (1) IF EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL ENTERED A STATE CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY OR A LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY WITH A VALID PHOTO
IDENTIFICATION CARD ISSUED BY THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION UNDER
§ 12–301 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE OR A DRIVER’S LICENSE AN ITEM
LISTED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL
RETURN THE IDENTIFICATION CARD OR DRIVER’S LICENSE EACH ITEM TO THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AT OR BEFORE THE TIME OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
RELEASE FROM CONFINEMENT.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION AND THE MANAGING
OFFICIAL:
(I) MAY NOT RETURN AN EXPIRED DRIVER’S LICENSE OR
PHOTO IDENTIFICATION ISSUED BY THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION UNDER
§ 12–301 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE TO AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL;
AND
(II) SHALL WORK WITH AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION TO RENEW:
1. THE DRIVER’S LICENSE BEFORE THE RELEASE OF THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IF:
A. THE DRIVER’S LICENSE THAT THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL POSSESSED AT THE TIME OF INTAKE EXPIRED LESS THAN 1 YEAR
BEFORE THE ANTICIPATED DATE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S RELEASE FROM
CONFINEMENT;
B. THE LICENSE HAS NOT BEEN REFUSED, REVOKED,
SUSPENDED, OR CANCELED UNDER ANY PROVISION OF THE MARYLAND VEHICLE
LAW; AND
C. THE LICENSE IS NOT SUBJECT TO A RESTRICTION
IMPOSED BY THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION; OR

HOUSE BILL 22 5
2. THE PHOTO IDENTIFICATION BEFORE THE RELEASE
OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IF:
A. THE DRIVER’S LICENSE THAT THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL POSSESSED AT THE TIME OF INTAKE EXPIRED 1 YEAR OR MORE BEFORE
THE ANTICIPATED DATE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S RELEASE FROM CONFINEMENT; OR
B. THE PHOTO IDENTIFICATION CARD ISSUED BY THE
MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 12–301 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE THAT THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL POSSESSED AT THE TIME OF
INTAKE EXPIRES BEFORE THE ANTICIPATED DATE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S RELEASE
FROM CONFINEMENT.
(D) (G) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH PARAGRAPHS (2)
AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, 6 MONTHS BEFORE THE ANTICIPATED RELEASE FROM
CONFINEMENT OF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE OF
1 YEAR OR MORE IN A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR A LOCAL CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY AS SOON AS REASONABLY PRACTICABLE AFTER THE CONFIRMATION
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER OF
CORRECTION AND THE MANAGING OFFICIAL OF A LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
SHALL PROVIDE THE APPROPRIATE FORMS TO AND WORK WITH THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL TO ENSURE THAT A PHOTO IDENTIFICATION CARD ISSUED BY THE
MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 12–301 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE OR A DRIVER’S LICENSE IS AVAILABLE TO THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
AT THE TIME OF RELEASE FROM CONFINEMENT.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE SATISFIED BY
RETURN OF A VALID UNEXPIRED IDENTIFICATION CARD OR DRIVER’S LICENSE TO
AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL UNDER SUBSECTION (C) (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE
COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION HAS DETERMINED THAT THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL IS IN POSSESSION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S UNEXPIRED
PHOTO IDENTIFICATION CARD ISSUED BY THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION
UNDER § 12–301 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE OR DRIVER’S LICENSE.
(H) (1) AT LEAST 3 MONTHS BEFORE THE ANTICIPATED RELEASE OF AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL, THE COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION SHALL
CONFIRM THAT THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WILL BE IN POSSESSION OF ALL
IDENTIFICATION DOCUMENTS REQUIRED TO BE OBTAINED UNDER THIS SECTION ON
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S RELEASE.
(2) IF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS RELEASED BEFORE THE
DATE OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S ANTICIPATED DATE OF RELEASE, THE

HOUSE BILL 22
COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION SHALL PROVIDE ALL IDENTIFICATION
DOCUMENTS BELONGING TO THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL TO:
(I) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AS SOON AS REASONABLY
PRACTICABLE; OR
(II) THE ISSUING AGENCY.
(E) (I) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED IN A MANNER THAT IN
ANY WAY DELAYS THE RELEASE FROM CONFINEMENT OF AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.